Utah statutes.
63G-2-310.   Records made public after 75 years.

(1)  The classification of a record is not permanent and a record that was not classified public under this act shall become a public record when the justification for the original or any subsequent restrictive classification no longer exists.  A record shall be presumed to be public 75 years after its creation, except that a record that contains information about an individual 21 years old or younger at the time of the record's creation shall be presumed to be public 100 years after its creation.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to records of unclaimed property held by the state treasurer in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed Property Act.

